Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3977
Field representative; powers; field representative permit; applicant; qualifications.

(1) Beginning August 1, 2008, milk plants or any entity purchasing raw milk from producers holding a permit under the Nebraska Milk Act may employ, contract with, or otherwise provide for the services of a competent and qualified field representative who may:

(a) Inform new producers about the requirements of dairy farm sanitation and assist dairy producers with milk quality problems;

(b) Collect and submit samples at the request of the department; and

(c) Advise the department of any circumstances that could be of public health significance.

(2) An applicant for a field representative permit shall be trained in the sanitation practices for the sampling, care of samples, and milk hauling requirements of the Nebraska Milk Act. Prior to obtaining a field representative permit, the applicant shall take and pass an examination approved by the department and shall pay the permit fee set forth in section 2-3971. The permit shall expire on July 31 of the year following issuance.

Laws 2007, LB111, § 13.